Nebraska, session 109, LB193.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB193 LB193
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 81-836, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-836 (1) It shall be the policy of the State of Nebraska to:
(a) Support the civilian and military command of the United States
and its efforts to promote and maintain prosperity, peace, and security
for America and its allies;
(b) Enhance the defensive posture of this state so as to protect
state citizens and assets and to contribute to the broader defensive
posture of the United States by reducing security vulnerabilities within
this state; and
(c) Exercise foresight and make reasonable preparations for a
potential regional or global conflict centered on the Pacific theater
which could involve attacks upon the United States and its allies in the
Pacific theater, which could involve asymmetrical attacks on the American
homeland, and which could cause the disruption or complete severing of
supply chains between this state and its vendors and the People's
Republic of China, the Republic of China, or other countries in the
Pacific theater.
(2) The Committee on Pacific Conflict is hereby created. The
committee shall consist of the following seven voting members:
(a) The Director of State Homeland Security, appointed pursuant to
section 81-830, who shall serve as chairperson of the committee;
(b) The Director of Administrative Services;
(c) The state investment officer;
(d) The Adjutant General; and
(e) Three individuals with applicable knowledge of the threats posed
to this state in the event of a Pacific conflict, including at least one
individual who represents an entity that is responsible for the operation
and maintenance of critical infrastructure in this state. Such
individuals shall be appointed by the Governor.
(3) The committee shall also include five four members of the
-2-

LB193 LB193
2025 2025
Legislature, to be appointed by the Executive Board of the Legislative
Council. The legislative members shall be nonvoting members of the
committee.
(4) Appointments to the committee shall be made within sixty days
after April 17, 2024.
(4) (5) The committee shall be authorized for an initial period of
three years.
(5) (6) The first meeting of the committee shall be held within
ninety days after April 17, 2024.
(6) (7) The committee shall meet no less than once every three
months. Additional meetings may be called at the will of the majority of
the voting members of the committee, and emergency meetings may be called
at the will of the chairperson of the committee or the Governor. In the
interest of state and national security, meetings of the committee shall
not be subject to the Open Meetings Act and the records and documents of
the committee shall not be considered public records for purposes of
sections 84-712 to 84-712.09.
(7) (8) At the discretion of the committee, an advisory board may be
established and subject matter experts may be consulted to provide
expertise or collaborative research support.
(8) (9) The committee is authorized to liaise with relevant federal
government authorities, authorities from other state governments, and
experts from research institutions for the purpose of obtaining
information that is useful for the committee's work.
(9) (10) The committee is authorized to produce policy
recommendations for the State of Nebraska.
(10) (11) The committee is authorized to conduct secure hearings or
briefings with critical infrastructure providers for the purpose of
understanding the threats, risks, and vulnerabilities posed to critical
infrastructure in the event of a Pacific conflict, including potential
mitigation or emergency response strategies.
-3-

LB193 LB193
2025 2025
(11) (12) The Governor shall annually produce and publish a state
threat assessment no later than the day prior to the annual address made
to the Legislature by the Governor. The annual state threat assessment
shall provide an overview of the substantial threats to state or national
security, state or national economic security, state or national public
health, or any combination of such matters, occurring within and
threatening the State of Nebraska to the extent such information can be
provided and stored in a manner that meets national security standards.
The state threat assessment shall include summary nonconfidential
findings of the Committee on the Pacific Conflict. Such summary
nonconfidential findings shall include no information that would create
any risk to state critical infrastructure or other sensitive state
assets.
(12) (13) The committee may, at the discretion of the committee and
upon an affirmative vote of five of the committee's seven voting members,
produce a confidential report that shall be kept in a secure location to
be determined by the Governor and which shall only be accessed with the
approval of the Governor. Such report shall contain information,
instructions, and other findings that the committee deems useful to
preserve for the elected leaders of the State of Nebraska.
Sec. 2. Original section 81-836, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-4-